src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_PIÕGˈGÂD !!= * @CODE@ piõggâd:piõgˈg

! gradation: extra::strong
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354, 356)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.2[332] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate)  
!   Extra strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Strong grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: piõgˈgâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: peâgˈg
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: peäʹǧˈǧe
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: piõʹǧˈǧe
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: piõgg
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: piõggâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: peâggas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: piõgˈgu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: peâgˈgaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: piõg»
! * Yaml: __V-pioggad__
! piõggâd:piõgˈg
! Extra strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1 piõggâd
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2 peâgˈg
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e K ; !3 peäʹǧˈǧe
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4 piõʹǧˈǧe
:%^CCC2CC VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 piõgg
+Pot+Sg3:%^CCC2CC%>âž   K ; !6 piõggâž
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CCC2CC%>as K ; !7 piõggas
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8 piõgˈgu

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^CCC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:%^CCC2CC»ât  V_AALǤTED ;


LEXICON V_PIÂSSÂD !!= * @CODE@ piâssâd:piâss
+V: V0_PIÂSSÂD ;
LEXICON IV_PIÂSSÂD !!= * @CODE@ piâssâd:piâss
+V+IV: V0_PIÂSSÂD ;
LEXICON TV_PIÂSSÂD !!= * @CODE@ piâssâd:piâss
+V+TV: V0_PIÂSSÂD ;
LEXICON V0_PIÂSSÂD !!= * @CODE@ piâssâd:piâss

! gradation: extra::strong::weak
! weak geminate
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
!    vowel_palatalization: â:e
! 1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1[231].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: piâssâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: peäss
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: peäʹsˈse
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: pieʹsˈse (allophonic)
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: piâzz
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: piâzzâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: peäzzas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: piâsˈsu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: peäsˈsaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: piâz»
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
!  piâssâd:piâss
! * Yaml: __V-piassad__
!  with lexc stem
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1 piâssâd
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2 peäss
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !3 peäʹsˈse
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4 pieʹsˈse
:%^KK2GG VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 piâzz
+Pot+Sg3:%^KK2GG%>âž   K ; !6 piâzzâž
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as K ; !7 piâzzas
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8 piâsˈsu
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^KK2GG»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:%^KK2GG»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_ČIÕKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiõkkâd:čiõkk
+V: V0_ČIÕKKÂD ;
LEXICON IV_ČIÕKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiõkkâd:čiõkk
+V+IV: V0_ČIÕKKÂD ;
LEXICON TV_ČIÕKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiõkkâd:čiõkk
+V+TV: V0_ČIÕKKÂD ;
LEXICON V0_ČIÕKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiõkkâd:čiõkk

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1[231].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: čiõkkâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: čeâkk
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: čeäʹǩˈǩe (allophonic)
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: čiõʹǩˈǩe
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: čiõǥǥ
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: čiõǥǥâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: čeâǥǥ
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: čiõkˈku
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: čeâkˈkaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: čiõǥ»
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
!  čiõkkâd:čiõkk
! * Yaml: __V-piassad__
!  with lexc stem
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1 čiõkkâd
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2 čeâkk
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !3 čeäʹǩˈǩe
:%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4 čiõʹǩˈǩe
:%^KK2GG VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 čiõǥǥ
+Pot+Sg3:%^KK2GG%>âž   K ; !6 čiõǥǥâž
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as K ; !7 čiõǥǥas
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8 čiõkˈku
+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:%^KK2GG»ât  V_AALǤTED ;


LEXICON V_HUÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ huõllâd:huõll
+V: V0_HUÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON IV_HUÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ huõllâd:huõll
+V+IV: V0_HUÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON TV_HUÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ huõllâd:huõll
+V+TV: V0_HUÕLLÂD ;
LEXICON V0_HUÕLLÂD !!= * @CODE@ huõllâd:huõll

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].2.1[231].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
! * Yaml: __V-huollad__
!  with lexc stem
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: huõllâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! +Der/mõš

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: huâll
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: hueʹlˈle
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: huõʹlˈle
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: huõlâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der/ted

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: huõlas
!! Imprt+Sg3

:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: huõlˈlu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^VOWLower%^CC2CCC%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: huâlˈlaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

+Der/škueʹtted:%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: huõl»


LEXICON V_SUÅPPÂD !!= * @CODE@ suåppâd:suåpp
+V: V0_SUÅPPÂD ;
LEXICON IV_SUÅPPÂD !!= * @CODE@ suåppâd:suåpp
+V+IV: V0_SUÅPPÂD ;
LEXICON TV_SUÅPPÂD !!= * @CODE@ suåppâd:suåpp
+V+TV: V0_SUÅPPÂD ;
