src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
cillvuõttâd:cillvuõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
cuõllâd:cuõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
huõllâd:huõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
jeällvuõttâd:jeällvuõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
jiõŋŋâd:jiõŋŋ V_HUÕLLÂD ;
joohlvuõttâd:joohlvuõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
juårrâd:juårr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
juõŋŋâd:juõŋŋ V_HUÕLLÂD ;
kuåkkâd:kuåkk V_PIÂSSÂD ;
kuõppâd:kuõpp V_HUÕLLÂD ;
kuõrrâd:kuõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
liâššâd:liâšš V_PIÂSSÂD ;
miâllâd:miâll V_SUÅPPÂD ;
miâssâd:miâss V_PIÂSSÂD ;
miõttâd:miõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
muållâd:muåll V_SUÅPPÂD ;
muårrâd:muårr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
muåššâd:muåšš V_PIÂSSÂD ;
muõššâd:muõšš V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
njiõjjâd:njiõjj V_HUÕLLÂD ;
njiõllâd:njiõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
njuõccâd:njuõcc V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
njuõrrâd:njuõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
nuõllâd:nuõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
pirrčuõppâd:pirrčuõpp V_HUÕLLÂD ;
piâkkâd:piâkk V_PIÂSSÂD ;
piâllâd:piâll V_SUÅPPÂD ;
piârrâd:piârr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
piâssâd:piâss V_PIÂSSÂD ;
piõŋŋâd:piõŋŋ V_HUÕLLÂD ;
puõccâd:puõcc V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
riõkkâd:riõkk V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
riõmmâd:riõmm V_HUÕLLÂD ;
riõššâd:riõšš V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
ruõjjâd:ruõjj V_HUÕLLÂD ;
ruõssâd:ruõss V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
ruõttâd:ruõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
siâssâd:siâss V_PIÂSSÂD ;
siõrrâd:siõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
smiõttâd:smiõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
suuʹdi-suuʹdi-siõrrâd:suuʹdi-suuʹdi-siõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
suåppâd:suåpp V_SUÅPPÂD ;
sǩiõppâd:sǩiõpp V_HUÕLLÂD ;
tiânnâd:tiânn V_SUÅPPÂD ;
tiârrâd:tiârr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
tuõnnâd:tuõnn V_HUÕLLÂD ;
tuõrrâd:tuõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
tuõssâd:tuõss V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
tuõttâd:tuõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
viânnâd:viânn V_SUÅPPÂD ;
viâppâd:viâpp V_SUÅPPÂD ;
viârrâd:viârr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
viõllâd:viõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
viõrrâd:viõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
viõssâd:viõss V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
viõŋŋâd:viõŋŋ V_HUÕLLÂD ;
vuåppâd:vuåpp V_SUÅPPÂD ;
vuõjjâd:vuõjj V_HUÕLLÂD ;
vuõllâd:vuõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
vuõrrâd:vuõrr V_HUÕLLÂD ;
čiõkkâd:čiõkk V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
čiõppâd:čiõpp V_HUÕLLÂD ;
čuårrâd:čuårr V_SUÅPPÂD ;
čuõccâd:čuõcc V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
čuõjjâd:čuõjj V_HUÕLLÂD ;
čuõllâd:čuõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
čuõppâd:čuõpp V_HUÕLLÂD ;
čuõvvâd:čuõvv V_HUÕLLÂD ;
šiõttâd:šiõtt V_HUÕLLÂD ;
šiõđđâd:šiõđđ V_HUÕLLÂD ;
ǩiâvvâd:ǩiâvv V_SUÅPPÂD ;
ǩiõkkâd:ǩiõkk V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
ǩiõllâd:ǩiõll V_HUÕLLÂD ;
ǩiõssâd:ǩiõss V_ČIÕKKÂD ;
